Indiana, session 2026, SB116.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-15-1-26 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 26. The office of the secretary shall post the following
information on the office of the secretary's website:
(1) The criteria used in determining whether an individual
may be considered medically frail under this article.
(2) Examples of the notices sent to Medicaid applicants and
recipients and an explanation of the meaning and reasoning
of the notice.
SECTION 2. IC 12-15-1-27 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 27. (a) As used in this section, "office" includes the
following:
(1) The office of the secretary of family and social services.
(2) A managed care organization that has contracted with the
office of Medicaid policy and planning under this article.
(3) A person that has contracted with:
2026 IN 116—LS 6478/DI 104


(A) the office of the secretary of family and social services;
or
(B) a managed care organization described in subdivision
(2).
(b) The office shall meet the following requirements concerning
a notice of termination of Medicaid services for a recipient:
(1) The notice must be provided to the recipient:
(A) at least twenty-one (21) days before the termination of
services is to occur; or
(B) if the time frame set forth in clause (A) would result in
the loss of federal financial participation, in the maximum
time that would allow for federal financial participation
for the services.
(2) The notice may not include information or references to
conditions or requirements of the program that are not being
implemented or enforced by the office.
SECTION 3. IC 12-15-1-28 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 28. (a) As used in this section, "office" includes the
following:
(1) The office of the secretary of family and social services.
(2) A managed care organization that has contracted with the
office of Medicaid policy and planning under this article.
(3) A person that has contracted with:
(A) the office of the secretary of family and social services;
or
(B) a managed care organization described in subdivision
(2).
(b) In conducting an eligibility redetermination of a recipient,
the office may not terminate coverage for a recipient until the
office has reviewed all relevant information timely submitted by
the recipient for the redetermination.
SECTION 4. IC 12-15-12-25 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 25. (a) On a quarterly basis, a
managed care organization shall provide a report to the office of
the secretary concerning the denial of claims. The report must
specify denials by program and by claim type for the previous
quarter.
(b) The office of the secretary shall post the reports submitted
under subsection (a) to the office of the secretary's website.
SECTION 5. IC 12-15-12-26 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
2026 IN 116—LS 6478/DI 104


CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 26. (a) A managed care
organization shall report on a monthly basis the following
information for the previous month to the office of the secretary by
Medicaid program:
(1) The number of Medicaid recipients covered by the
managed care organization.
(2) The number of Medicaid recipients removed and each
reason for the removal.
(3) The number of Medicaid recipients reinstated.
(4) The number of calls to the managed care organization's
help line.
(5) The average wait time per call to the managed care
organization's help line.
(b) The office of the secretary shall post the reports submitted
under subsection (a) to the office of the secretary's website.
SECTION 6. IC 12-15-12.7-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.174-2025,
SECTION 41, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) In addition to the reporting requirements
under IC 12-15-12-25 and on a monthly basis, a managed care
organization shall provide a report to the office of the secretary
concerning the denial of claims. The report must specify denials by
claim type for the previous month if the denials for the claim type total
at least five percent (5%).
(b) The office of the secretary shall post the reports submitted under
subsection (a) to the office of the secretary's website.
SECTION 7. IC 12-15-44.5-3.5, AS AMENDED BY
P.L.180-2022(ss), SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. (a) The plan must
include the following in a manner and to the extent determined by the
office:
(1) Mental health care services.
(2) Inpatient hospital services.
(3) Prescription drug coverage, including coverage of a long
acting, nonaddictive medication assistance treatment drug if the
drug is being prescribed for the treatment of substance abuse.
(4) Emergency room services.
(5) Physician office services.
(6) Diagnostic services.
(7) Outpatient services, including therapy services.
(8) Comprehensive disease management.
(9) Home health services, including case management.
2026 IN 116—LS 6478/DI 104


(10) Urgent care center services.
(11) Preventative care services.
(12) Family planning services:
(A) including contraceptives and sexually transmitted disease
testing, as described in federal Medicaid law (42 U.S.C. 1396
et seq.); and
(B) not including abortion or abortifacients.
(13) Hospice services.
(14) Substance abuse services.
(15) Donated breast milk that meets requirements developed by
the office of Medicaid policy and planning.
(16) A service determined by the secretary to be required by
federal law as a benchmark service under the federal Patient
Protection and Affordable Care Act.
(17) Retroactive coverage of at least thirty (30) days.
(b) The plan may not permit treatment limitations or financial
requirements on the coverage of mental health care services or
substance abuse services if similar limitations or requirements are not
imposed on the coverage of services for other medical or surgical
conditions.
(c) The plan may provide vision services and dental services only
to individuals who regularly make the required monthly contributions
for the plan as set forth in section 4.7(c) of this chapter.
(d) The benefit package offered in the plan:
(1) must be benchmarked to a commercial health plan described
in 45 CFR 155.100(a)(1) or 45 CFR 155.100(a)(4); and
(2) may not include a benefit that is not present in at least one (1)
of these commercial benchmark options.
(e) The office shall provide to an individual who participates in the
plan a list of health care services that qualify as preventative care
services for the age, gender, and preexisting conditions of the
individual. The office shall consult with the federal Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention for a list of recommended preventative care
services.
(f) The plan shall, at no cost to the individual, provide payment of
preventative care services described in 42 U.S.C. 300gg-13 for an
individual who participates in the plan.
(g) The plan shall, at no cost to the individual, provide payments of
not more than five hundred dollars ($500) per year for preventative
care services not described in subsection (f). Any additional
preventative care services covered under the plan and received by the
individual during the year are subject to the deductible and payment
2026 IN 116—LS 6478/DI 104


requirements of the plan.
(h) The office shall apply to the United States Department of Health
and Human Services for any amendment to the waiver necessary to
implement the providing of the services or supplies described in
subsection (a)(15). This subsection expires July 1, 2024.
2026 IN 116—LS 6478/DI 104